apertium-chm.chm.twol
Alphabet
 А Е Ё И О Ӧ У Ӱ Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ Ы ы Ӹ ӹ Ӓ
 ӓ а е ё и о ӧ у ӱ э ю я б в г д ж з й к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ

 %{ы%}:ы %{ы%}:0 %>:0 •:0;

Sets

Vowel = А Э И О У Ы Я Е Ё Ю Ӧ Ӱ
	а э и о у ы я е ё ю ӧ ӱ ;

Consonant = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ җ ң һ Җ Ң Һ Ғ ғ Ҡ ҡ
	    б в г д ж з й к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

Voiceless = к т д п ф ш ч х b ;

Reduced = е о ӧ;

Rules 

"Add ы to when adding s enclitic to consonant ending word"
%{ы%}:ы <=> :~Vowel %>: _  ;

! %{ы%}:ы <=> :Consonant %>: _  ;
! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
